Maine, session 132, LD1466.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4801, sub-§1, ¶A-2 is enacted to read:
A-2. Notwithstanding paragraph A, the commissioner shall, on request of a school
board, reduce or waive the minimum number of days required under this subsection
for the purpose of exempting a school from making up any instructional days missed
due to the following circumstances:
(1) The school is located in a section of the State for which a state of emergency
has been declared by the Governor pursuant to Title 37-B, section 742, subsection
1; and
(2) The school was in fact unable to operate due to circumstances or conditions
related to the reason for the emergency proclamation described in subparagraph
(1).
Sec. 2. Department of Education to amend its rules related to missed
instructional days. The Department of Education shall amend its rules to provide an
expedited process to exempt a school from making up missed instructional days pursuant
to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A, section 4801, subsection 1, paragraph A-2. The
rules must provide that a school requesting an exemption pursuant to Title 20-A, section
4801, subsection 1, paragraph A-2 may not be required to submit a waiver application.